North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-15 Cooperative Associations
10-15-53.2.
Secretary of state — Involuntary dissolution — Revocation of certificate of authority.

With respect to involuntary dissolution of a cooperative by the secretary of state:

A cooperative may be involuntarily dissolved by the secretary of state if:

The cooperative has failed to:

File with the secretary of state its annual report or any other record required to be filed with the secretary of state under this chapter together with the fees provided in section 10-15-54; or

Appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in section 10-15-12; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the cooperative pursuant to this chapter.

A cooperative that fails to file its annual report, together with the fees provided in section 10-15-54, before April first of the year following the year it is found to be not in good standing ceases to exist and is considered involuntarily dissolved by operation of law.

The secretary of state shall note the dissolution of the certificate of incorporation of the cooperative on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the dissolved cooperative.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the cooperative to its principal office.

The decision of the secretary of state that the cooperative has been involuntarily dissolved under this subsection is final.

A cooperative that was dissolved for failure to file an annual report may be reinstated as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-15-53.3.

Except for dissolution of a cooperative for failure to file the annual report as provided in section 10-15-53.1, a cooperative may not be dissolved by the secretary of state unless:

The secretary of state has given the cooperative not less than sixty days’ notice by mail addressed to its principal office; and

During the sixty-day period, the cooperative has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or the registered agent;

File any other required record; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the existence of the cooperative ceases. The secretary of state shall issue a notice of dissolution and shall mail the notice to the cooperative to its principal office.

With respect to the revocation of a certificate of authority of a foreign cooperative by the secretary of state:

The certificate of a foreign cooperative to transact business in this state may be revoked by the secretary of state if:

The foreign cooperative has failed to:

File with the secretary of state its annual report or any other record required to be filed with the secretary of state under this chapter together with the fees provided in section 10-15-54;

Appoint and maintain a registered agent and registered office as provided in section 10-15-12;

File with the secretary of state any amendment to its application for a certificate of authority as provided in section 10-15-52.3;

File with the secretary of state any merger as provided in section 10-15-52.1; or

File with the secretary of state an application for certificate of withdrawal of its authority as provided in section 10-15-52.4 when the existence of the foreign cooperative has expired or the foreign cooperative has been dissolved in the jurisdiction of the foreign cooperative; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the foreign cooperative pursuant to this chapter.

A foreign cooperative that fails to file its annual report, together with the fees provided in section 10-15-54, before April first of the year following the year it is found not to be in good standing forfeits its authority to transact business in this state and its certificate of authority is considered revoked by operation of law.

The secretary of state shall note the revocation of the certificate of authority of the foreign cooperative on the records of the secretary of state and shall give notice of the action to the foreign cooperative.

Notice by the secretary of state must be mailed to the last registered agent of the cooperative at its last registered office in this state or, if the cooperative failed to maintain a registered agent in this state, mailed to its principal office.

The decision of the secretary of state that a certificate of authority must be revoked under this subsection is final.

A foreign cooperative for which authority was forfeited by, and certificate of authority was revoked by the secretary of state for failure to file an annual report may be reinstated as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-15-53.3 and may appeal as provided in subsection 2 of section 10-15-53.3.

Except for revocation of the certificate of authority for failure to file the annual report as provided in section 10-15-53.1, a certificate of authority of a foreign cooperative may not be revoked by the secretary of state unless:

The secretary of state has given the foreign cooperative not less than sixty days’ notice by mail addressed to its registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the cooperative failed to maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office; and

During the sixty-day period, the foreign cooperative has failed to:

File the report of change as provided in chapter 10-01.1 regarding the registered office or the registered agent;

File any amendment;

File any merger;

File an application for withdrawal;

File any other required record; or

Correct the misrepresentation.

Upon expiration of sixty days after the mailing of the notice, the authority of the foreign cooperative to transact business in this state ceases. The secretary of state shall issue a notice of revocation and shall mail the notice to the registered agent at the registered office in this state or, if the foreign cooperative failed to maintain a registered agent in this state, the notice must be mailed to its principal office.

If the cooperative or foreign cooperative files its annual report after the notice with the fee provided for in section 10-15-54 for late filing, the secretary of state shall restore the certificate of incorporation or authority to good standing. Until restored to good standing, the secretary of state may not accept for filing any document respecting the cooperative or foreign cooperative except those incident to its dissolution or withdrawal.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 86, § 7, effective July 1, 2015.

10-15-53.3.
Secretary of state — Reinstatement following an involuntary dissolution or revocation of authority — Appeals.

With respect to reinstatement following involuntary dissolution or revocation of authority:

A cooperative dissolved for failure to file an annual report or a foreign cooperative for which authority was forfeited by failure to file an annual report may be reinstated by filing the most recent past-due report, together with the statutory filing and penalty fees for an annual report and a reinstatement fee. The fees must be paid and the report filed within one year following the date of the involuntary dissolution or revocation. Reinstatement under this section does not affect the rights or liability of any person for the time from the dissolution or revocation to the reinstatement.

With respect to a reinstatement that is more than one year after involuntary dissolution or revocation:

If the secretary of state dissolves a cooperative or revokes the certificate of authority to transact business in this state of any foreign cooperative, under the provisions of section 10-15-53.2, the cooperative or foreign cooperative may appeal to district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County for reinstatement by filing with the clerk of court a petition, including:

A copy of the articles of incorporation of the cooperative and a copy of the notice of the involuntary dissolution given by the secretary of state; or

A copy of the certificate of authority of the foreign cooperative to transact business in this state and a copy of the notice of revocation given by the secretary of state.

If the court order sought is one for reinstatement of a cooperative that has been dissolved as provided in subsection 1 of section 10-15-53.2, or reinstatement of the certificate of authority of a foreign cooperative that has been revoked as provided in subsection 2 of section 10-15-53.2, together with any other actions the court deems proper, any order that reverses the decision of the secretary of state shall require the cooperative or foreign cooperative to:

File the most recent past-due annual report;

Pay the fees to the secretary of state for all past-due annual reports as provided in subsection 10 of section 10-15-54; and

Pay the reinstatement fee to the secretary of state as provided in subsection 10 of section 10-15-54.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by the district court under this section in review of any ruling or decision of the secretary of state may be taken as in other civil actions.

Reinstatement returns the cooperative to active status:

As of the date of the reinstatement:

In the office of the secretary of state; and

As to persons adversely affected by the reinstatement; and

As of the date of the involuntary dissolution or revocation:

Validates contracts or other acts within the authority of the articles, and the cooperative is liable for those contracts or acts; and

Restores to the cooperative all assets and rights of the cooperative and its members to the extent they were held by the cooperative and its members before the involuntary dissolution or revocation occurred, except to the extent that assets or rights were affected by acts occurring after the involuntary dissolution or revocation, sold, or otherwise distributed after that time.

Reapplication for any license or permit by a reinstated cooperative must be pursuant to the law governing the issuance of the license or permit.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments by the district court under this subsection may be taken as in other civil actions.

With respect to appeals of the rejection by the secretary of state of any record required to be approved by the secretary of state before the record may be filed:

The secretary of state shall give written notice of the rejection to the person that delivered the record, specifying the reasons for rejection.

Within thirty days after the service of the notice of denial, the cooperative or foreign cooperative may appeal to the district court in the judicial district serving Burleigh County by filing with the clerk of court a petition setting forth a copy of the record sought to be filed and a copy of the written rejection of the record by the secretary of state.

The matter must be tried de novo by the court.

The court either shall sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take the action as the court may deem proper.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments by the district court under this subsection may be taken as in other civil actions.

The matter must be tried de novo by the court. The court shall either sustain the action of the secretary of state or direct the secretary of state to take the action as the court may deem proper.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 86, § 8, effective July 1, 2015.

10-15-54.
Fees.

No document may be filed or recorded nor any certificate issued until all fees therefor have been paid. Any fee or penalty due under this chapter may be recovered in a suit brought by the attorney general in the name of the state. The secretary of state shall charge and collect from any association for:

Filing articles of association and issuing a certificate of association, thirty dollars.

Filing articles of amendment and issuing a certificate of amendment, twenty dollars.

Filing restated articles of association, thirty dollars.

Filing articles of merger or consolidation and issuing a certificate of merger or consolidation, fifty dollars.

Filing articles or decree of dissolution, twenty dollars.

Receiving service of any process, notice, or demand, the fee provided in section 10-01.1-03.

Filing an application of a foreign cooperative for a certificate of authority to do business in this state and issuing a certificate therefor, forty dollars.

For filing a name reservation, a transfer of name reservation, a cancellation of name reservation, or a consent to use of name, ten dollars.

For filing a change of registered office or change of registered agent, or both, the fees provided in section 10-01.1-03.

Filing an annual report of a cooperative or foreign cooperative, twenty dollars.

The secretary of state shall charge and collect additional fees for late filing of the annual report as follows:

After the date provided in subsection 4 of section 10-15-53.1, five dollars.

After the notice provided in subsection 5 of section 10-15-53.1, ten dollars.

After the dissolution of a cooperative or the revocation of the certificate of authority of a foreign cooperative, a reinstatement fee of thirty dollars.

Fees paid to the secretary of state under this subsection are not refundable if an annual report submitted to the secretary of state cannot be filed because the report lacks information required by section 10-15-53.1, or the annual report lacks sufficient payment as required by this subsection.

Filing any other document or statement, or issuing any other certificate, ten dollars.

Filing a statement of correction, twenty dollars.

Any document submitted for approval before the actual time of submission for filing, one-half of the fee provided in this section for filing the document.

Furnishing a copy of any record, or paper relating to a cooperative or a foreign cooperative:

The fee provided in section 54-09-04 for copying a record; and

Five dollars for a search of records.

Furnishing a certificate of good standing, existence, authorization, or certifying any copy:

Fifteen dollars; and

Five dollars for a search of records.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1554; S.L. 1967, ch. 98, § 24; 1975, ch. 83, § 1; 1983, ch. 134, § 2; 1993, ch. 75, § 6; 1997, ch. 102, § 7; 2005, ch. 99, § 5; 2007, ch. 99, § 11; 2011, ch. 87, § 6; 2015, ch. 86, § 9, effective July 1, 2015.

10-15-55.
Defense of ultra vires.

No act and no transfer of property to or by a cooperative is invalid because made in excess of the cooperative’s power, except that such lack of power may be asserted in a proceeding by:

A member, stockholder, or director against the cooperative to enjoin any act or any transfer of property to or by the cooperative.

The cooperative or its legal representative against any present or former officer or director.

The attorney general against the cooperative in an action to dissolve the cooperative or to enjoin it from the transaction of unauthorized business.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1555.

10-15-56.
Member or stockholder derivative actions.

No action may be instituted or maintained in the right of any association by a member or stockholder unless the member or stockholder:

Alleges in a complaint that the person was a member or registered stockholder when any part of the transaction of which the person complains took place, or that the person’s stock thereafter devolved upon the person by operation of law from a stockholder at such time.

Alleges in a complaint with particularity the person’s efforts to secure from the board such action as the person desires. The person shall allege further that the person has either informed the association or board in writing of the ultimate facts of each claim for relief against each director or that the person has delivered to the association or board a copy of the complaint which the person proposes to file. The person shall state the reasons for the person’s failure to obtain such action or the reasons for not making such effort.

The action shall not be dismissed or compromised without the approval of the court.

If anything is recovered or obtained as the result of the action, whether by means of a compromise and settlement or by a judgment, the court may, out of the proceeds of the action, award the plaintiff the reasonable expenses of maintaining the action, including reasonable attorney’s fees, and may direct the plaintiff to account to the association for the remainder of such proceeds.

In any action brought in the right of an association by less than three percent of the members or by holders of less than three percent of any class of stock outstanding, the defendants may require the plaintiff to give security for the reasonable expenses of defending such action, including attorney’s fees. The amount of such security may thereafter be increased or decreased in the discretion of the court upon showing that the security provided is or may be inadequate or is excessive.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1556; S.L. 1985, ch. 82, § 14.

10-15-57.
Forms to be furnished by secretary of state.

The secretary of state may provide forms for any document to be filed in the secretary of state’s office under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1557.

10-15-57.1.
Correcting a filed record.

With respect to correction of a filed record:

Whenever a record authorized by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state has been filed and inaccurately records the action referred to in the record, contains an inaccurate or erroneous statement, or was defectively or erroneously signed, sealed, acknowledged, or verified, the record may be corrected by filing a statement of correction.

A statement of correction:

Must:

Be signed by:

The person that signed the original record; or

By a person authorized to sign on behalf of that person;

Set forth the name of the cooperative that filed the record;

Identify the record to be corrected by description and by the date of its filing with the secretary of state;

Identify the inaccuracy, error, or defect to be corrected; and

Set forth a statement in corrected form of the portion of the record to be corrected.

May not revoke or nullify the record.

The statement of correction must be filed with the secretary of state.

With respect to the effective date of correction:

A certificate issued by the secretary of state before a record is corrected, with respect to the effect of filing the original record, is considered to be applicable to the record as corrected as of the date the record as corrected is considered to have been filed under this subsection.

After a statement of correction has been filed with the secretary of state, the original record as corrected is considered to have been filed on the date the original record was filed as to all other persons and for all other purposes.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 87, § 7.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.

10-15-57.2.
Secretary of state — Certificates and certified copies to be received in evidence.

All certificates issued by the secretary of state and all copies of records filed in accordance with this chapter, when certified by the secretary of state, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the facts stated.

A certificate by the secretary of state under the great seal of this state, as to the existence or nonexistence of the facts relating to a cooperative which would not appear from a certified copy of any of the foregoing records or certificates, may be taken and received in all courts, public offices, and official bodies as evidence of the existence or nonexistence of the facts stated.

Any certificate or certified copy issued by the secretary of state under this section may be created and disseminated as an electronic record with the same force and effect as if produced in a paper form.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 87, § 8.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2011.

10-15-58.
Use of term cooperative — Penalty for improper use.

The term “cooperative”, or any variation thereof, may be used either by any association organized under this chapter or under other laws of this state relating to cooperative corporations.

No other person may use the term “cooperative”, or any variation thereof, as part of the person’s corporate or other business name or title, nor may any other person in any other manner represent that that person is a cooperative. A violation of this subsection is an infraction.

Any cooperative may obtain an injunction against acts prohibited by subsection 2 without showing any damage to itself.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1558; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 72.

10-15-59.
Associations not in restraint of trade.

No association organized under this chapter shall be deemed to be a combination in restraint of trade or an illegal monopoly, or an attempt to lessen competition or fix prices arbitrarily. The marketing contracts or agreements between any such association and its members, or any agreements authorized in this chapter, shall not be considered illegal nor in restraint of trade.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1559.

10-15-60.
Application of chapter.

All foreign and domestic cooperatives are governed by the provisions of this chapter except that they shall not apply to cooperatives governed by title 26 or by chapters 6-06, 10-12, 10-13, 36-08, or 49-21, except when the laws governing such associations clearly adopt or refer to any provisions of this chapter or refer to provisions of the general law governing cooperatives.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1560.

10-15-61.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the North Dakota Cooperative Association Act.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 104, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-1561.

10-15-62.
Secretary of state — Confidential records.

Any social security number or federal tax identification number disclosed or contained in any document filed with the secretary of state under this chapter is confidential. The secretary of state shall delete or obscure any social security number or federal tax identification number before a copy of any document is released to the public.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 99, § 6.